Utah statutes.
39-6-15.   Military court -- Composition.

(1)  In the National Guard that is not in federal service, there is a military court to hear matters designated under the UCMJ.

(2)  The court shall be composed of:

(a)  a military judge and not fewer than three members; or

(b)  a military judge, if before the court is assembled, the accused, knowing the identity of the military judge and after consultation with his defense counsel, requests in writing a court composed only of a military judge, and the military judge approves the request.



Enacted by Chapter 210, 1988 General Session

